dev/verb_pardefs.dix
<pardef n="/abeezen__vblex_sep">
  <e><p><l>abeezen</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>agebeezt</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>beezen<b/>an</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>beez<b/>an</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>beezt<b/>an</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>beezen<b/>an</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>beezt<b/>an</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>beezen<b/>an</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>beez<b/>an</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>beezt<b/>an</l><r>abeezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/aberuffen__vblex_sep">
  <e><p><l>aberuffen</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>aberuff</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>beruffen<b/>an</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>beriffs<b/>an</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>berifft<b/>an</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>beruffen<b/>an</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>berufft<b/>an</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>beruffen<b/>an</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>beruff<b/>an</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>berufft<b/>an</l><r>aberuffen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/abezuelen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>abezuelen</l><r>abezuelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/abilden__vblex_sep">
  <e><p><l>abilden</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>agebilt</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>bilden<b/>an</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bilts<b/>an</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bilt<b/>an</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bilden<b/>an</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bilt<b/>an</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bilden<b/>an</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>bilt<b/>an</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bilt<b/>an</l><r>abilden<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/abiméieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>abiméieren</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abiméiert</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>abiméieren</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abiméiers</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abiméiert</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abiméieren</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abiméiert</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abiméieren</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>abiméier</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abiméiert</l><r>abiméieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/abonnéieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>abonnéieren</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abonnéiert</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>abonnéieren</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abonnéiers</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abonnéiert</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abonnéieren</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abonnéiert</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abonnéieren</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>abonnéier</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abonnéiert</l><r>abonnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/abriechen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>abriechen</l><r>abriechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/absolvéieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>absolvéieren</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absolvéiert</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>absolvéieren</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absolvéiers</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absolvéiert</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absolvéieren</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absolvéiert</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absolvéieren</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>absolvéier</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absolvéiert</l><r>absolvéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/absorbéieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>absorbéieren</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absorbéiert</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>absorbéieren</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absorbéiers</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absorbéiert</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absorbéieren</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absorbéiert</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absorbéieren</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>absorbéier</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>absorbéiert</l><r>absorbéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/abuddelen__vblex_sep">
  <e><p><l>abuddelen</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>agebuddelt</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>buddelen<b/>an</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>buddels<b/>an</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>buddelt<b/>an</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>buddelen<b/>an</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>buddelt<b/>an</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>buddelen<b/>an</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>buddel<b/>an</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>buddelt<b/>an</l><r>abuddelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/abuséieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>abuséieren</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abuséiert</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>abuséieren</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abuséiers</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abuséiert</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abuséieren</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abuséiert</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abuséieren</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>abuséier</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>abuséiert</l><r>abuséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/abéissen__vblex_sep">
  <e><p><l>abéissen</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>agebéisst</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>béissen<b/>an</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>béiss<b/>an</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>béisst<b/>an</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>béissen<b/>an</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>béisst<b/>an</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>béissen<b/>an</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>béiss<b/>an</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>béisst<b/>an</l><r>abéissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/accaparéieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>accaparéieren</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>accaparéiert</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>accaparéieren</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>accaparéiers</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>accaparéiert</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>accaparéieren</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>accaparéiert</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>accaparéieren</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>accaparéier</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>accaparéiert</l><r>accaparéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
